Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.210

K-12 education data improvement system.

(1) It is the legislature's intent to establish a comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system for financial, student, and educator data. The objective of the system is to monitor student progress, have information on the quality of the educator workforce, monitor and analyze the costs of programs, provide for financial integrity and accountability, and have the capability to link across these various data components by student, by class, by teacher, by school, by district, and statewide. Education data systems must be flexible and able to adapt to evolving needs for information, but there must be an objective and orderly data governance process for determining when changes are needed and how to implement them. It is the further intent of the legislature to provide independent review and evaluation of a comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system by assigning the review and monitoring responsibilities to the education data center and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

(2) It is the intent that the data system specifically service reporting requirements for teachers, parents, superintendents, school boards, the legislature, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the public.

(3) It is the legislature's intent that the K-12 education data improvement system used by school districts and the state include but not be limited to the following information and functionality:

(a) Comprehensive educator information, including grade level and courses taught, building or location, program, job assignment, years of experience, the institution of higher education from which the educator obtained his or her degree, compensation, class size, mobility of class population, socioeconomic data of class, number of languages and which languages are spoken by students, general resources available for curriculum and other classroom needs, and number and type of instructional support staff in the building;

(b) The capacity to link educator assignment information with educator certification information such as certification number, type of certification, route to certification, certification program, and certification assessment or evaluation scores;

(c) Common coding of secondary courses and major areas of study at the elementary level or standard coding of course content;

(d) Robust student information, including but not limited to student characteristics, course and program enrollment, performance on statewide and district summative and formative assessments to the extent district assessments are used, and performance on college readiness tests;

(e) A subset of student information elements to serve as a dropout early warning system;

(f) The capacity to link educator information with student information;

(g) A common, standardized structure for reporting the costs of programs at the school and district level with a focus on the cost of services delivered to students;

(h) Separate accounting of state, federal, and local revenues and costs;

(i) Information linking state funding formulas to school district budgeting and accounting, including procedures:

(i) To support the accuracy and auditing of financial data; and

(ii) Using the prototypical school model for school district financial accounting reporting;

(j) The capacity to link program cost information with student performance information to gauge the cost-effectiveness of programs;

(k) Information that is centrally accessible and updated regularly; and

(l) An anonymous, nonidentifiable replicated copy of data that is updated at least quarterly, and made available to the public by the state.

(4) It is the legislature's goal that all school districts have the capability to collect state-identified common data and export it in a standard format to support a statewide K-12 education data improvement system under this section.

(5) It is the legislature's intent that the K-12 education data improvement system be developed to provide the capability to make reports as required under RCW 28A.300.507 available.

(6) It is the legislature's intent that school districts collect and report new data elements to satisfy the requirements of RCW 43.41.400, this section, and RCW 28A.300.507, only to the extent funds are available for this purpose.

[ 2009 c 548 s 202.]

NOTES:

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.